2018-komp-ling/practicals/Practical2/HFST/chv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Имя существительное
%<pl%>               ! Множественное число
%<nom%>              ! Именительный падеж
%<ins%>              ! Творительный падеж
%<gen%>		     ! Родительный падеж

%{A%}                ! Архифонема [а] или [е] (па-пе)
%{Ă%}                ! Архифонема [ӑ] или [ӗ]
%{м%}		     ! Архифонема [м]

%>                   ! Граница морфемы

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON CASES 

%<gen%>:%>%{Ă%}н # ;
%<ins%>:%>п%{A%} # ;

LEXICON PLURAL

             CASES ;
%<pl%>:%>сем CASES ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: PLURAL ;

LEXICON Nouns

урам:урам N ;     ! "улица"
пакча:пакча N ;   ! "сад"
хула:хула N ;     ! "город"
канаш:канаш N ;   ! "совет"
